Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5925.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-37.1-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-37.1 entitled "Sexual
Offender Registration and Community Notification" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-37.1-10. Penalties.
(a) Any person who is required to register or verify his or her address or give notice of a
change of address or residence who knowingly fails to do so shall be guilty of a felony and, upon
conviction, be imprisoned not more than ten (10) years, or fined not more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000), or both.
(b) Any person who is required to register or verify his or her address or give notice of a
change of address or residence who knowingly fails to do so shall be in violation of the terms of
his or her release, regardless of whether or not the term was a special condition of his or her release
on probation, parole, home confinement or other form of supervised release.
(c) Except in the case of a level-three (3) sex offender, any Any person who is required to
register or verify his or her address, who knowingly resides within three hundred feet (300′) of any
school as defined in § 11-37.1-2, which distance shall be measured from the nearest boundary line
of the real property supporting the residence of the person to the nearest boundary line of the real
property that supports or upon which there exists a school shall be guilty of a felony and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned not more than five (5) years, or fined not more than five thousand
dollars ($5,000), or both.

(d) Any level-three (3) sex offender who knowingly resides within one thousand feet
(1,000′) of any school as defined in § 11-37.1-2, which distance shall be measured from the nearest
boundary line of the real property supporting the residence of the person to the nearest boundary
line of the real property that supports or upon which there exists a school shall be guilty of a felony
and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not more than
five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001341
========
LC001341 - Page 2 of 3